Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.010

Office created—Appointment of administrator.

There shall be a state office to be known as the administrative office of the courts. The executive officer of the administrative office of the courts is the administrator for the courts, who shall be appointed by and hold office at the pleasure of the supreme court of this state. The administrator's salary shall be fixed by the supreme court.

[ 2005 c 282 s 5; 1984 c 20 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 255 s 7; 1974 ex.s. c 156 s 1; 1969 c 93 s 1; 1957 c 259 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 255: See note following RCW 43.03.010.